Louisiana, session 2026, HB661.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 42:1119(B)(2)(a)(vii) is hereby enacted to read as follows:
§1119. Nepotism
* * *
B.
* * *
(2) Notwithstanding the provisions of Paragraph (1) of this Subsection:
(a)
* * *
(vii) Any local school board may employ an immediate family member of
any board member or of the superintendent as a paraprofessional, custodian, or
cafeteria worker provided the family member meets the required criteria of the
position. Any school board member or superintendent whose immediate family
Page 1 of 2
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 661 ENROLLED
member is employed by the school board shall recuse himself from any decision
involving the promotion or assignment of such employee.
* * *
Section 2. R.S. 42:1119(B)(2)(a)(v) is hereby repealed.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 2 of 2
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.